Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
Double jeopardy not applicable where offenses charged are separate and distinct.—

Prosecution of defendant for felony interference with a peace officer, after defendant had pleaded guilty to misdemeanor interference with a peace officer, did not violate the Double Jeopardy Clause because defendant committed two separate acts of interference when police officers responded to a domestic disturbance at defendant's home, as misdemeanor interference occurred inside defendant's home when defendant resisted arrest, while felony interference occurred outside the home when defendant elbowed an officer. Redding v. State, 2016 WY 41, 371 P.3d 136,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2016).

Defendant was properly sentenced consecutively for the crimes for which defendant was convicted because there was no double jeopardy violation in that aggravated assault and battery was not the same offense as attempted second-degree murder pursuant to the same-elements test. Jones v. State, 2016 WY 110, 384 P.3d 260,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2016).

It was not plain error to convict defendant of both strangulation of a household member and the lesser-included offense of domestic battery because the convictions did not violate a clear and unequivocal rule of law, as the convictions did not violate double jeopardy since the crimes arose from separate and distinct acts, as the underlying acts occurred in different rooms and were separated by some amount of time and resulted in separate injuries to the victim. Drakeford v. State, 2017 WY 115, 402 P.3d 980,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 2017).

Kidnapping and first-degree sexual abuse of a minor each require an element the other does not, as the former requires sexual intrusion, whereas the latter does not, and that the kidnapping charge referred to the sexual abuse charge was of no moment, as the jury was not required to find every element of sexual abuse to convict defendant of kidnapping, and the jury had to find only that defendant removed the child victim with the intent to commit sexual abuse. Double jeopardy did not require the sentences to be merged. Winters v. State, 2019 WY 76, 446 P.3d 191,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2019).

As prohibition represents policy of finality. —

The prohibition against placing a defendant “twice in jeopardy” represents a constitutional policy of finality for the defendant's benefit in criminal proceedings. Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled, Crozier v. State, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986).

And curb on power of state. —

The state with all its resources and power should not be allowed to make repeated attempts to convict an individual for an alleged offense, thereby subjecting him to embarrassment, expense and ordeal and compelling him to live in a continuing state of anxiety and insecurity, as well as enhancing the possibility that even though innocent he may be found guilty. Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled, Crozier v. State, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986).

When double jeopardy attaches. —

Double jeopardy does not attach in the case of a jury trial until a jury is empaneled and sworn. Richmond v. State, 554 P.2d 1217,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 558 P.2d 509,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 323

(Wyo. 1977).

Statutory elements analysis. —

Defendant's conviction for incest was a lesser-included offense of the crime of first-degree sexual abuse of a minor and constituted the “same offense” under a double jeopardy analysis. Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2013).

The statutory elements analysis should be used as the foundation for double jeopardy protection in connection with both multiple prosecutions and multiple or cumulative punishments. State v. Keffer, 860 P.2d 1118,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1993).

Same elements test is Wyoming's sole test for evaluating sentencing merger questions (overruling past decisions applying the facts or evidence test, including
James v. State, 2012 WY 35, 271 P.3d 1016 (Wyo. 2012);
Winstead v. State, 2011 WY 137, 261 P.3d 743 (Wyo. 2011);
Najera v. State, 2009 WY 105, 214 P.3d 990 (Wyo. 2009);
Bilderback v. State, 13 P.3d 249 (Wyo. 2000);
Rouse v. State, 966 P.2d 967 (Wyo. 1998);
Owen v. State, 902 P.2d 190 (Wyo. 1995);
Rivera v. State, 840 P.2d 933 (Wyo. 1992)).Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Aug 14, 2013).

For case setting forth statutory elements analysis, see State v. Keffer, 860 P.2d 1118,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1993).

Civil vs. criminal penalty. —

The Wyoming supreme court has adopted a five-criteria test to determine whether a penalty imposed by the state is “civil” or “criminal”; the court considers: (1) type of offense; (2) penalty; (3) collateral consequences; (4) punitive significance; and (5) arrest and detention. Glasrud v. City of Laramie, 934 P.2d 1242,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1997).

Information sufficient to protect from double jeopardy.

See Vernier v. State, 909 P.2d 1344,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1996).

Double jeopardy not applicable where offenses charged are separate
and distinct. —

If the offenses charged are separate and distinct, either with respect to statutory definition, or because they grow out of different transactions and different evidence is needed to prove each, then the constitutional inhibition against double jeopardy is not applicable. Jackson v. State, 522 P.2d 1356,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 419 U.S. 1055, 95 S. Ct. 637, 42 L. Ed. 2d 652, 1974 U.S. LEXIS 3665 (U.S. 1974); Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

Court did not violate defendant's double jeopardy rights by failing to merge his sentences because defendant was convicted of burglary for entering a home without authorization to demand sex from the female victim and aggravated assault and battery for the vicious beating which followed the victim's refusal to comply with his demands for sex. The elements of the two crimes were very different, and defendant could have committed either of his crimes without necessarily committing the other.
Gould v. State, 2006 WY 157, 151 P.3d 261,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 2006), cert. denied, 552 U.S. 854, 128 S. Ct. 125, 169 L. Ed. 2d 88, 2007 U.S. LEXIS 9472 (U.S. 2007).

Defendant's contention that she was twice placed in jeopardy for the same offense when she was prosecuted for child endangerment after she had been convicted of misdemeanor possession of a controlled substance stemming from the same methamphetamine found in her trailer was rejected because the elements of the two crimes were different.
Granzer v. State, 2010 WY 130, 239 P.3d 640,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2010).

And defendant may be found guilty and sentenced as to each
offense. —

So long as the offenses charged are not factually inconsistent, a defendant may be found guilty and judgment of sentence thereon may be had as to each of the offenses charged without a violation of double jeopardy. Jackson v. State, 522 P.2d 1356,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 419 U.S. 1055, 95 S. Ct. 637, 42 L. Ed. 2d 652, 1974 U.S. LEXIS 3665 (U.S. 1974); Jerskey v. State, 546 P.2d 173,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1976).

No double jeopardy violation in sentencing. —

Under the Blockburger analysis, first-degree premeditated murder requires proof of premeditated malice, while aggravated robbery does not require proof of malice, and the jury expressly found defendant guilty of both first-degree premeditated murder and aggravated robbery; therefore, merger of the sentence to life imprisonment on defendant's first-degree murder conviction and the sentence to a term of years on defendant's aggravated robbery conviction was not required. Sincock v. State, 2003 WY 115, 76 P.3d 323,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2003).

By imposing four consecutive sentences, a trial court did not violate defendant's right against multiple punishments for the same offense after defendant pled guilty to two counts of aggravated assault and battery and two counts of DUI with serious bodily injury; the factual basis provided evidence of defendant's intoxication, as well as other evidence of erratic, dangerous, and irresponsible driving. James v. State, 2012 WY 35, 271 P.3d 1016,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2012), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

District court properly defendant's motions to correct an illegal sentence because there was no increase in punishment and no violation of his double jeopardy protections; all of the fees imposed upon defendant's conviction were mandated by statute, and the statutes indicated that the fees were imposed as a result of being convicted in a criminal case, not as part of the sentence for any particular crime.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Because defendant's previous sentence was illegal, he had no justifiable expectation of finality in his sentence. Therefore, there was no double jeopardy violation when defendant's sentence was increased by three months after he had begun serving it. Patterson v. State, 2013 WY 153, 314 P.3d 759,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2013).

Plea did not prohibit State's continued prosecution on remaining
charges. —

Notwithstanding the district court's acceptance of defendant's guilty pleas to two drug-related crimes, defendant was not entitled to use the Double Jeopardy Clauses as a sword to prevent the State from completing its prosecution on another drug-related charge in count two when it did not agree to defendant's guilty pleas. State v. King, 2002 WY 93, 48 P.3d 396,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2002).

Multiple preliminary hearings. —

One preliminary hearing, unproductive for the state, does not prohibit another. Richmond v. State, 554 P.2d 1217,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1976), reh'g denied, 558 P.2d 509,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 323

(Wyo. 1977).

Driver's license suspensions. —

Driver's license suspensions under §

31-6-102

do not constitute punishment for purposes of double jeopardy, because they are civil proceedings, separate and distinct from prosecutions for driving while under the influence. Glasrud v. City of Laramie, 934 P.2d 1242,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1997).

Erroneous discharge of jury. —

Erroneous or void discharge of jury on Sunday will not deprive court of further jurisdiction, and whether it may furnish accused with good defense, either as matter of law or fact, upon another trial for same offense, is to be determined in the manner provided by law the same as any other defense, and accused is not entitled to discharge on habeas corpus. Hovey v. Sheffner, 16 Wyo. 254, 93 P. 305,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1908).

Discussion of settled double jeopardy principles. —

See Vigil v. State, 563 P.2d 1344,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 252

(Wyo. 1977).

Not in trying all offenses at once. —

See Vigil v. State, 563 P.2d 1344,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 252

(Wyo. 1977).

Where defendant was charged with five counts of assault with a deadly weapon, there was no prejudice in charging, trying and submitting them to the jury, receiving the five verdicts, and sentencing on only one. Vigil v. State, 563 P.2d 1344,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 252

(Wyo. 1977).

Conviction permitted on two distinct factually consistent charges.
—

If two offenses charged are separate and distinct either with respect to statutory definition or because they grow out of different transactions and different evidence is needed to prove each, the constitutional inhibition against double jeopardy is not applicable and, so long as the offenses charged are not factually inconsistent, a defendant may be found guilty and judgment and sentence entered thereon may be had as to each of the offenses charged. Goodman v. State, 601 P.2d 178,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1979).

And on distinct offenses emanating from single act or transaction.
—

Two or more distinct offenses may emanate from the same transaction or act and the rule that a person cannot be put twice in jeopardy for the same offense has no application where two separate and distinct crimes are committed by one and the same act. Goodman v. State, 601 P.2d 178,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1979).

It is not double jeopardy to be tried for several offenses arising out of the same episode in a single trial. Hamill v. State, 602 P.2d 1212,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 483

(Wyo. 1979).

Where the defendant performed fellatio upon the victim and then made the victim reciprocate, two distinct acts of fellatio were committed and two separate sentences proper. Baum v. State, 745 P.2d 877,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 534

(Wyo. 1987).

Where the defendant was tried and acquitted on a charge of larceny and was subsequently tried and convicted on a charge of burglary arising out of the same circumstances giving rise to the larceny charge, the trial court in the burglary case properly declined to apply the doctrine of collateral estoppel to evidence used in the defendant's earlier trial for larceny. Eatherton v. State, 810 P.2d 93,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1991).

Substantive crime and conspiracy to commit crime are not same offense

for double jeopardy purposes, and the fact that there is a mere overlap of proof between two prosecutions does not establish a double jeopardy violation. Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. July 8, 1992), cert. denied, 506 U.S. 1022, 113 S. Ct. 661, 121 L. Ed. 2d 586, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 7732 (U.S. 1992).

No double jeopardy violation occurred in prosecution for conspiracy to commit rape since the conduct constituting the crime of conspiracy is separate and apart from the conduct that makes up the substantive offenses of rape and kidnapping. Phillips v. State, 835 P.2d 1062,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. July 8, 1992).

Doctrine of merger was not applicable to the offenses of conspiracy to commit first-degree murder and being an accessory to first-degree murder. Vena v. State, 941 P.2d 33,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1997), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

No double jeopardy violation. —

Reinstatement
of prior action, which resulted in conviction, did not violate double
jeopardy protections, as nothing indicated prosecutorial intent to
goad defense into moving for mistrial. Derrera v. State, 2014 WY 77, 327 P.3d 107,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2014).

Defendant's second trial did not violate his right against double jeopardy because the record was devoid of any evidence indicating prosecutorial intent to goad the defense into moving for a mistrial; and, although defendant contended that he had no other option but to request a mistrial in the first trial and that the prosecutor forced him into that position by providing objectionable material to the jury, and that the prosecutor's conduct was perhaps negligent, there was no intent to manipulate defendant into moving for a mistrial. Montoya v. State, 2016 WY 127, 386 P.3d 344,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2016).

After defendant's first trial resulted in a mistrial at his request, defendant's motion to dismiss the case before the second trial began based on the prohibition against double jeopardy was properly denied as the prosecutor did not goad defendant into requesting a mistrial because, although the prosecutor acknowledged that he misunderstood the law and conceded his questioning encroached on defendant's right to silence, the prosecutor's comments did not support a conclusion that he acted intentionally in the hopes of the trial ending prematurely as he explained that he did not act maliciously in trying to impeach defendant with statements he had previously made; and he argued that the error did not rise to the level of requiring a mistrial. King v. State, 2017 WY 129, 403 P.3d 1070,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2017).

Notice invalid for improper included lesser offense. —

Where the information charged defendant with only second degree sexual assault, instructing jury members that defendant could be convicted for taking indecent liberties with a child worked material prejudice for failure of full proper notice, requiring reversal. Derksen v. State, 845 P.2d 1383,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1993).

Prosecution for homicide of fetus and assault on pregnant woman
not double jeopardy. —

A defendant may be prosecuted both for the act of killing an unborn child during an assault and battery on a pregnant woman and for the assault and battery on the pregnant woman (or her killing) without violating the rule against double jeopardy. Goodman v. State, 601 P.2d 178,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1979).

Aggravated assault and DUI injury separate offenses. —

The prosecution and conviction of the defendant for aggravated assault and battery after he pled guilty to causing serious bodily injury to another as a result of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor did not violate the constitutional prohibition against double jeopardy, since each offense required proof of an element not necessary for proof of the other. Nowack v. State, 774 P.2d 561,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1989).

Conviction of misdemeanor battery did not prevent prosecution
for aggravated assault and battery. —

Prosecution of defendant for aggravated assault and battery was not barred by the double jeopardy provision of the Wyoming and U.S. Constitutions even though defendant had already been convicted of misdemeanor battery in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(b) based on the same attack because although evidence of the greater offense existed at the time of the original conviction, the state was unable to discover such evidence despite the exercise of due diligence.
Daniel v. State, 2008 WY 87, 189 P.3d 859,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2008).

Aggravated burglary and aggravated assault and battery statutes do not proscribe same offense,

and multiple punishments therefor do not violate the constitutional double jeopardy prohibition. Lauthern v. State, 769 P.2d 350,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1989).

Dual sentences for aggravated assault and escape. —

The imposition of dual and consecutive sentences for aggravated assault (§

6-2-502

) and attempted escape (§§

6-5-206

and

6-1-301

), for a single violent escape attempt, which could have resulted in a single sentence under §

6-5-207

(escape by violence), did not violate double jeopardy constitutional provisions. Under the applicable statutory elements test, clearly different offenses were demonstrated, while the prosecutor had the requisite discretion to elect the charge or charges which could be brought based on the specific facts of the case. DeSpain v. State, 865 P.2d 584,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1993).

Prosecution for burglary and larceny constitutional. —

The defendant's constitutional rights against double jeopardy were not denied when the state was allowed to prosecute him for burglary and the lesser included offense of larceny in the same prosecution. Eatherton v. State, 761 P.2d 91,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1988).

Burglary and property destruction separate offenses. —

Burglary requires unauthorized entry of a building or vehicle; property destruction does not. Property destruction requires unauthorized destruction or injury to property; burglary does not. Even though both violations can arise from the same incident, each has an element not found in the other; burglary and property destruction are defined by different statutes with different elements and provide separate penalties and, therefore, constitute two separate offenses. Longstreth v. State, 890 P.2d 551,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1995).

But not larceny and failure to account. —

Where evidence of embezzlement by larceny is also evidence used to support the charge of a public official's failure to account, these offenses have merged. Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. Nov. 7, 1988).

No double jeopardy violation where charges involve different
victims. —

Defendant's double jeopardy rights were not violated where he pleaded guilty to misdemeanor interference with an officer, and was later prosecuted for felony interference, because the charges involved different victims. Pope v. State, 2002 WY 9, 38 P.3d 1069,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2002).

Suspension of license constituted double jeopardy. —

Section

31-7-126

(former) and
§ 31-7-128(f), which provide for the suspension of driver's license for individuals less than 19 years of age when convicted of possession or consumption of alcohol, constituted punishment for a previous conviction in violation of the prohibition of double jeopardy under this section.
Johnson v. State Hearing Examiner's Office, 838 P.2d 158,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1992).

Cumulative sentences for second-degree murder and use of firearm
constitute double jeopardy. —

Cumulative sentences for attempted second-degree murder and use of a firearm in the commission thereof were improper as the charges merged for punishment purposes and only one sentence should have been imposed. Bilderback v. State, 13 P.3d 249,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 218

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. Dec. 5, 2000), modified,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. Dec. 15, 2000), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Double jeopardy not violated by consecutive sentences. —

The judge's decision to sentence defendant to consecutive sentences for felony murder and the underlying felony (i.e., conspiracy) did not violate the double jeopardy clauses of the United States and Wyoming constitutions. Schultz v. State, 751 P.2d 367,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1988).

Consecutive sentences for felony murder and conspiracy to commit aggravated robbery did not violate the double jeopardy clauses of the United States and Wyoming constitutions, where the evidence necessary to support the conspiracy charge was not the same as the evidence necessary to support the felony murder charge. Garcia v. State, 774 P.2d 623,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1989).

Nor by later-required restitution. —

The reserve determination of assessable costs to include a conjectural right to later require restitution is not in contravention of the double-jeopardy clause.
Kaess v. State, 748 P.2d 698,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1987).

Consecutive sentences for multiple counts of sexual assault.
—

A defendant who is being sentenced for two or more separate acts of sexual assault in the second degree may be sentenced to consecutive life sentences for each separate act without implicating the double jeopardy clause; thus, the court did not err in sentencing defendant to six consecutive life sentences where he pleaded guilty to six counts of sexual assault. DeLoge v. State, 2002 WY 155, 55 P.3d 1233,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2002).

Enhanced sentence for felony as habitual offender not prohibited.
—

The trial court did not err in allowing prior crimes to be used a second time to enhance defendant's current sentence; habitual criminality is a status rather than a substantive offense, and a finding of such only enhances punishment for the most recent qualifying event. Kearns v. State, 2002 WY 97, 48 P.3d 1090,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2002).

Consecutive sentences for assaulting 2 victims constitutional.
—

Imposition of consecutive sentences upon conviction of two counts of aggravated assault and battery involving two victims did not violate the double jeopardy clause, where defendant committed two separate acts against two different individuals, each of which violated a single criminal statute. Tuggle v. State, 733 P.2d 610,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1987).

Criminal conviction following juvenile adjudication. —

Protection against double jeopardy under
U.S. Const. amend. V and
Wyo. Const. art. I, § 11 was violated because defendant was adjudged
delinquent of sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree and then
criminally prosecuted and punished for the same offense.
Haynes v. State, 2012 WY 151, 288 P.3d 1225,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2012).

Where two statutes are intended to suppress different evils,

the acquittal or conviction on one will not prevent prosecution of the other. Goodman v. State, 601 P.2d 178,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1979).

When defendant waives defense of former jeopardy. —

If a defendant so requests and a mistrial is granted, he is deemed, absent prosecutorial bad faith or overreaching, to have waived any argument of former jeopardy to prevent a retrial. Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled, Crozier v. State, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986).

In those situations in which a defendant neither requests or acquiesces nor specifically objects to the granting of a mistrial, a plea of former jeopardy is ineffective if incomplete termination of the trial was dictated by “manifest necessity” or to meet “the ends of public justice.” Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled, Crozier v. State, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986).

A trial judge may discharge a genuinely deadlocked jury and require the defendant to submit to a second trial, as this accords recognition to society's interest in giving the prosecution one complete opportunity to convict those who have violated its laws. Peterson v. State, 586 P.2d 144,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 238

(Wyo. 1978), overruled, Crozier v. State, 723 P.2d 42,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 595

(Wyo. 1986).

A reviewing court may consider the merits of a defendant's double jeopardy challenge following entry of an unconditional guilty or no contest plea if the claim can be resolved on the basis of the charging documents and/or the record as it existed at the time the defendant pleaded. If resolution of the claim requires evidence outside the existing record, the claim shall be deemed waived by the guilty or no contest plea. Redding v. State, 2016 WY 41, 371 P.3d 136,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2016).

Compulsory process. —

At a trial for conspiracy to commit burglary, the district court erred when it denied defendant's request for handwriting exemplars from a co-conspirator's statement as the subpoena process provided the court with legal authority to require a non-party to appear before trial to provide handwriting exemplars. A defendant can be compelled to provide handwriting exemplars without violating the right against self-incrimination. West v. State, 2013 WY 128, 311 P.3d 157,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2013).

If jury cannot agree on verdict, there is no bar

to a subsequent prosecution for the same offense before a different jury. Jones v. State, 580 P.2d 1150,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1978).

Prosecution for escape not barred by previous punishment imposed
by prison. —

A criminal prosecution for prison escape is not barred by a plea of former jeopardy based on disciplinary punishment previously imposed by prison authorities for the same escape. Hamby v. State, 559 P.2d 1388,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1977).

Prosecution for escape was not barred by a previous punitive sanction imposed by the Wyoming state penitentiary in moving defendant to solitary confinement, or segregation, for a period not to exceed six months, prior to the criminal prosecution. Martz v. State, 566 P.2d 222,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1977).

Separate sentences constitutional. —

The imposition of separate sentences for aiding and abetting aggravated robbery and for conspiracy to commit burglary did not violate the constitutional prohibition against double jeopardy, since the legislature intended the offenses to be punished as separate offenses. Duffy v. State, 789 P.2d 821,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1990).

Punishment for felony murder and underlying felony unconstitutional.
—

The imposition of multiple punishments for felony murder and the underlying felony violates the double jeopardy clauses of the United States and Wyoming constitutions. Cook v. State, 841 P.2d 1345,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1992).

Separate sentences unconstitutional. —

Defendant's right against double jeopardy was violated when he was convicted and sentenced on multiple counts of cruelty to animals that resulted from a single continuous criminal transaction. Amrein v. State, 836 P.2d 862,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1992).

Separate sentencing for felony and as habitual offender prohibited.
—

Sentencing a defendant for a felony and then sentencing the defendant again for his status as an habitual offender would violate the double jeopardy prohibition. Evans v. State, 655 P.2d 1214,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 417

(Wyo. 1982).

Changing concurrent sentence to consecutive sentence unconstitutional.
—

Where a defendant was sentenced to concurrent terms of imprisonment following his convictions for aggravated burglary and interference with a peace officer, but successfully challenged the aggravated burglary conviction (which was reduced to simple burglary), along with the life sentence imposed for that offense pursuant to Wyoming's “habitual criminal” statute, the district court judge violated the defendant's constitutional right against double jeopardy when he subsequently increased the defendant's sentence for interference with a peace officer by improperly changing the sentence from running concurrent to running consecutive with the defendant's simple burglary sentence. Simonds v. State, 799 P.2d 1210,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1990).

Defendant's conviction did not amount to double jeopardy where he had previously been punished administratively

by loss of good time. Hurst v. State, 563 P.2d 232,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1977), overruled in part, Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982).

Allowance of writ of review would not necessarily place defendant
in jeopardy for a second time. —

In defendant's aggravated assault case, where the district court concluded that the prosecution's conduct provided grounds for a mistrial, granted the defense motion, and dismissed the case with prejudice on the basis of speedy trial concerns, the State's writ of review was appropriate. The State had no other adequate remedy, the issues presented were of constitutional magnitude and public importance, and it was not established that allowing the writ would place defendant in jeopardy for a second time. State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2004).

Retrial following reversal because of legal error constitutional.
—

The retrial of the defendant did not place him twice in jeopardy, because the reversal of his prior conviction was premised upon the incorrect receipt of evidence and an incorrect instruction. Stamper v. State, 701 P.2d 557,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 487

(Wyo. 1985).

Course of retrial following reversal. —

On retrial of a person following reversal, there is no restriction on the evidence that can be produced: a verdict of guilty can be found and all the incidents of a new trial, including statutorily required findings, can be pursued in every respect as though upon original trial, less, of course, the errors found in the first trial. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

And retrial not limited to findings at first trial. —

Where a death penalty is reversed purely as a matter of law, the submission, or finding in a new sentencing trial of aggravating circumstances found not to exist in the first trial does not amount to double jeopardy. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

Because the jury in the first trial of the defendant imposed the death sentence, there was no “acquittal” of the death sentence; therefore, there was no double jeopardy in the retrial of the penalty phase, and on aggravating circumstances not found to exist in the first trial could be found to have existed in the second. State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 474 U.S. 865, 106 S. Ct. 187, 88 L. Ed. 2d 155, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 4988 (U.S. 1985).

Double jeopardy. —

Defendant’s convictions and sentences for two counts of kidnapping violated double jeopardy because the evidence was insufficient to show that two kidnappings occurred, as the evidence did not support the State’s position that the victim regained her liberty when she was allowed to clean her mouth in the kitchen before defendant removed the victim from the home and put her in the backseat of her car. Volpi v. State, 2018 WY 66, 419 P.3d 884,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2018).

Defendant’s convictions and sentences for strangulation of a household member and domestic battery did not violate double jeopardy because defendant failed to carry his burden of proving that the two convictions were based on the same incident, as the first was based on defendant’s pushing the victim down on the concrete, grabbing her hair, and slamming her head against the ground as she exited her vehicle to look for her keys, and the second was based on defendant’s covering the victim’s mouth and nose with his hand and pressing down until she could not breath while inside their apartment. Volpi v. State, 2018 WY 66, 419 P.3d 884,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2018).

Self-incrimination privilege asserted in workers' compensation
proceedings. —

Employee properly
asserted the privilege against self-incrimination in workers' compensation
proceedings, in response to discovery requests, because the employee
gave a reasoned explanation for invoking the privilege, as the employee
reasonably believed the employee's discovery responses could be used
in a criminal prosecution under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-510(a). Debyah v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2015 WY 94, 353 P.3d 711,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2015).

It was an
abuse of discretion for a hearing examiner to dismiss an employee's
workers' compensation claim for asserting the privilege against self-incrimination
in response to discovery requests because the hearing examiner only
found the requested information was relevant, rather than balancing
the employee's properly asserted privilege against the conflicting
interests of the Workers' Compensation Division. Debyah v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2015 WY 94, 353 P.3d 711,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2015).

Double jeopardy barred retrial after acquittal. —

Where the jury found defendant not guilty of attempted first degree murder and attempted second degree murder, the district court granted the State's motion to dismiss the attempted first degree murder charge without prejudice. Because the State could not re-charge defendant under the Double Jeopardy Clause, an order clarifying that the dismissal was with prejudice was appropriate.
Landeroz v. State, 2011 WY 168, 267 P.3d 1075,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 2011).

Re-trial was not barred where jury deadlocked. —

Because the jury's failure to reach a verdict on the attempted manslaughter charge was not an event which terminated jeopardy, the State could re-prosecute defendant for that charge.
Landeroz v. State, 2011 WY 168, 267 P.3d 1075,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 2011).

Vindictive prosecution not shown. —

Where defendant was charged with possession and concealment of the stolen property and disposing of the identical stolen property, the second count having previously been charged, but that case was dismissed without prejudice after the jury was seated and the first witness was sworn, and the jury in the second trial found defendant guilty of both counts, but the trial judge sentenced him only on count I, later dismissing count II, the defendant did not show there was vindictive prosecution because he was charged with the second count in the second trial. Crozier v. State, 882 P.2d 1230,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1994), limited, State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2004).

Habitual criminal statute does not punish a defendant for his previous offenses but for his persistence in crime, and to be a habitual criminal involves a status rather than the commission of a separate offense; hence, the use of defendant's prior convictions in 1983, 1987, and 1997 to enhance each of his aggravated assault convictions did not violate his right against double jeopardy. Urbigkit v. State, 2003 WY 57, 67 P.3d 1207,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

State v. Hambrick, 65 Wyo. 1, 196 P.2d 661,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1948); Raigosa v. State, 562 P.2d 1009,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1977); Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981); Brown v. State, 661 P.2d 1024,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 303

(Wyo. 1983); Thom v. State, 792 P.2d 192,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1990); Higgins v. State, 889 P.2d 964,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1995); Geiser v. State, 920 P.2d 1243,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1996); Daniel v. State, 923 P.2d 728,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1996); Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(2004).

Stated

in

Stuebgen v. State, 548 P.2d 870,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1976); Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975); Griffin v. State, 749 P.2d 246,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1988); Jandro v. State, 781 P.2d 512,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1989); Burk v. State, 848 P.2d 225,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1993); Talbott v. State, 902 P.2d 719,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1995); Miller v. State, 904 P.2d 344,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1995); Madrid v. State, 910 P.2d 1340,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1996); Munoz v. Munoz, 2002 WY 4, 39 P.3d 390,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2002); Rice v. State, 2004 WY 130, 100 P.3d 371,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(2004); Daniels v. State, 2014 WY 125,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Oct. 8, 2014); Hamilton v. State, 2015 WY 39,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Mar. 9, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Immunity and the Grand Jury,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1973).

As to the privilege against self-incrimination and the Federal Rules of Evidence, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 601 (1977).

For article, “Insanity, Bifurcation and Due Process: Can Values Survive Doctrine,” see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 515 (1978).

For case note, “Receiving Stolen Property — The Doctrine of Recent Possession and Problems Associated with Defendant's Testimony. Russell v. State, 583 P.2d 690,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 291 (1979).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure, Constitutional Law — Applying the ‘Fruit of the Poisonous Tree’ Doctrine to Evidence Obtained through Statements Made Without Proper Miranda Warnings. Stamper v. State, 662 P.2d 82,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1984).

For article, “Silence is no Longer Golden: Destruction of the Right to Remain Silent,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1984).

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — The State's Right to Appeal in Criminal Cases. State v. Heiner, 683 P.2d 629,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1984),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 723 (1985).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — Improper Comment Upon Post-Arrest Silence: Wyoming Returns to the Prejudicial Per Se Rule. Westmark v. State, 693 P.2d 220,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1984),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 231 (1986).
